Utah statutes.
77-18-13.   Hearing -- Standard of proof -- Exception.
(1)  The court shall review the petition, certificate of eligibility, and any
written evaluation and receive any testimony or writing submitted by a victim
or prosecuting attorney.
(2)  The court shall issue a certificate to the petitioner, stating the
court's finding that the petition and certificate of eligibility are
sufficient and the statutory requirements for expungement have been satisfied
unless there is clear and convincing evidence to persuade the court that it
would be contrary to the interest of the public to grant a requested
expungement.
(3)  Except as otherwise provided by law, a person receiving expungement of a
conviction under this section may respond to any inquiry as though the
conviction did not occur.
